Utah, session 2026, HB20.
Section 1. Section 51-9-1001 is enacted to read:10. Corrections Facility Expansion Restricted Account51-9-1001. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Offender" means the same as that term is defined in Section 64-13-1.(2)"Restricted Account" means the Corrections Facility Expansion Restricted Account created in Section 51-9-1002.(3)"State correctional facility" means a facility operated by the Department of Corrections to house offenders.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 51-9-1002 is enacted to read:51-9-1002. Corrections Facility Expansion Restricted Account.(1)There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Corrections Facility Expansion Restricted Account."(2)The restricted account shall consist of:(a)the portion of appropriations from new legislation for the Department of Corrections for:(i)any state correctional capital facilities costs; and(ii)beginning the second fiscal year of a bill's implementation, one time savings that occur from delayed estimated fiscal impacts of increases in the population level of state correctional facilities;(b)interest, dividends, or other earnings attributable to the restricted account; and(c)additional money appropriated by the Legislature.(3)The Legislature may appropriate money from the restricted account only for the purpose of expanding existing, or constructing new, state correctional facilities.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect:(1)except as provided in Subsection (2), May 6, 2026; or(2)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(a)upon approval by the governor;(b)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(c)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.